Oklahoma, session 2025, SB70.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 318.1 of Title 75, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


In the interpretation of a state statute, administrative rule,


or other subregulatory document, a court of this state or an officer


hearing an administrative action shall not defer to the


interpretation of a state agency and shall interpret the meaning and


effect de novo. In an action brought by or against a state agency,


after applying all customary tools of interpretation, the court or


hearing officer shall exercise any remaining doubt in favor of a



Req. No. 188 Page 1


reasonable interpretation which limits agency power and maximizes


individual liberty.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-188 TEK 1/19/2025 5:41:37 AM







































Req. No. 188 Page 2